Washington statutes.
RCW 13.20.060

Transfer of administration of juvenile court services to county executive—Authorized—Advisory board—Procedure.

In addition, and alternatively, to the authority granted by RCW 13.20.010, the judges of the superior court of any county with a population of one million or more operating under a county charter providing for an elected county executive are hereby authorized, by a majority vote, subject to approval by ordinance of the legislative authority of the county to transfer to the county executive the responsibility for, and administration of all or part of juvenile court services, including detention, intake and probation. The superior court and county executive of such county are further authorized to establish a five-member juvenile court advisory board to advise the county in its administration of such services, facilities and programs. If the advisory board is established, two members of the advisory board shall be appointed by the superior court, two members shall be appointed by the county executive, and one member shall be selected by the vote of the other four members. The county is authorized to contract or otherwise make arrangements with other public or private agencies to provide all or a part of such services, facilities and programs. Subsequent to any transfer to the county of responsibility and administration of such services, facilities and programs pursuant to the foregoing authority, the judges of such superior court, by majority vote subject to the approval by ordinance of the legislative authority of the county, may retransfer the same to the superior court.

[ 1991 c 363 s 13; 1975 1st ex.s. c 124 s 1.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.